Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. In General

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-15-101.
Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to and govern:

Attachment, replevin and garnishment proceedings in all district courts and circuit courts of this state;

Post judgment garnishment in small claims proceedings as provided by W.S.

1-21-205

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(i), substituted “and circuit courts” for “county courts and justice of the peace courts” preceding “of this state.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Subject Matter Jurisdiction.—

District court had subject matter jurisdiction because an airport had no duty to comply with the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989 when it was seeking redress for the independent acts of a lessee, which was not a bank or a financial institution. Sky Harbor Air Serv. v. Cheyenne Reg'l Airport Bd., 2016 WY 17, 368 P.3d 264,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 1-15-102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter unless otherwise defined:

“Attachment” means the procedure by which a plaintiff obtains a judicial lien on a defendant’s property prior to judgment;

“Continuing garnishment” means any procedure for withholding the earnings of a judgment debtor for successive pay periods for payment of a judgment debt;

“Court” means any district court or circuit court of this state;

“Defendant” means a person whose property is being attached, garnished or replevied by a plaintiff and includes a judgment debtor after entry of judgment;

“Disposable earnings” means that part of an individual’s earnings remaining after the deduction of all amounts required by law to be withheld;

“Earnings” or “earnings from personal services” means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, proceeds of any pension or retirement benefits or deferred compensation plan or otherwise;

“Garnishee” means a person other than a plaintiff or defendant who is in possession of earnings or property of the defendant and who is subject to garnishment in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

“Garnishment” means the procedure by which a plaintiff on whose behalf a writ of garnishment has been issued against a defendant reaches tangible or intangible personal property of the defendant in the possession, control or custody of, or debts or other monetary obligations owing by, a third person;

“Judgment creditor” means any person who has recovered a money judgment against a judgment debtor in a court of competent jurisdiction;

“Judgment debtor” means any person who has a judgment entered against him in a court of competent jurisdiction;

“Officer” means sheriff;

“Plaintiff” means a person who is attaching, garnishing or repleving property of a defendant and includes a judgment creditor after entry of judgment;

“Replevin” means the procedure by which a plaintiff in a pending action to recover possession of property obtains redelivery of property claimed to be wrongfully taken or detained;

“Financial institution” means as defined in W.S. 13-1-401(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2019 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii), deleted “or justice of the peace courts” preceding “of this state,” and made a related change.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(xiv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

As enacted, subsection (a) of this section contained two paragraphs (x) and two paragraphs (xi). The second paragraph (x) has been redesignated as paragraph (xii) and the second paragraph (xi) has been redesignated as paragraph (xiii).

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 70 § 2, provides: "This act shall apply only to writs of garnishment issued on or after the effective date of this act."

“Disposable earnings.” —

Debtor's claimed exemption of earnings up to a specified percentage failed because the accounts receivable of his business could not be considered “disposable earnings”. In re Welty, 217 B.R. 907, 1998 Bankr. LEXIS 92 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1998).

Income from growing wheat
on farm fell within “earnings” exemption provisions of of §

1-17-411

,

prior to the 1987 amendment thereof.
Lingle State Bank v. Podolak, 740 P.2d 392,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 480

(Wyo. 1987).

Business profits and crop receipts not “earnings.” —

Any application of “otherwise” in subsection (a)(vi) is limited to the character of third-party obligations payable for services rendered by the claimant for exemption. Intrinsic to the meaning of this section are the provisions of §

1-15-408

which are related to earnings for personal services periodically payable. Business profits and receipts from crop and livestock simply cannot be logically impressed with the garnishment concept. Coones v. FDIC, 796 P.2d 803,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1990).

Proceeds from sale of cattle not “earnings.” —

Where ranching operations were the judgment debtor's sole source of income and the funds in his bank account which were garnished represented proceeds from the sale of his cattle, the statutory exemption for earnings under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-15-408

did not apply as the funds were not traceable to a third-party obligation payable periodically within the meaning of § 1-15-102(a)(vi). McManaman v. McManaman, 2002 WY 128, 53 P.3d 103,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 2002).

Income tax refunds not “earnings.” —

Debtor's income tax refund, which included earned income credit, did not constitute “earnings” or “disposable earnings” exempt from garnishment. Trudeau v. Royal (In re Trudeau), 237 B.R. 803, 1999 Bankr. LEXIS 1075 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 1999).

Executory waiver of earnings exemption is not permissible as matter of public policy,

and a security agreement which purports to deny a debtor and his family a statutory earnings exemption is precisely the type of executory arrangement that is objectionable and contrary to public policy. Lingle State Bank v. Podolak, 740 P.2d 392,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 480

(Wyo. 1987) (decided under §

1-17-411

prior to 1987 amendment).

Cited

in

Coones v. FDIC, 848 P.2d 783,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1993); Union Pac. R.R. v. Trona Valley Fed. Credit Union, 2002 WY 165, 57 P.3d 1203,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 1-15-103.
General procedures relating to prejudgment writs of attachment, replevin
and garnishment; issuance of writs without notice.

Prejudgment writs of attachment, replevin and garnishment shall be issued subject to the following conditions and circumstances:

The writ shall issue only upon written motion and pursuant to a written order of the court;

The court shall not direct the issuance of the writ without notice to the adverse party and an opportunity to be heard unless it clearly appears from specific facts shown by affidavit or by the verified complaint that immediate and irreparable injury will result to the plaintiff before notice can be served and a hearing had thereon. A finding by the court that the plaintiff will suffer irreparable injury shall be made only if the court finds the existence of either of the following circumstances:

There is present danger that the property will be immediately disposed of, concealed, or placed beyond the jurisdiction of the court; or

The value of the property will be impaired substantially if the issuance of an order of attachment is delayed.

An order granted without notice authorizing the issuance of a writ shall be endorsed with the date and hour of issuance and shall be filed in the clerk’s office and entered of record. The order shall define the injury and state why the injury is irreparable and why the order was granted without notice. The order, and any writ issued pursuant thereto, shall expire within a time fixed by the court, not to exceed ten (10) days after issuance. Within the time fixed, the court may, after notice and hearing, order the writ continued in effect or the adverse party may consent that the writ may be extended for a longer period. The reasons for the extension shall be entered of record;

If the order granting the writ is issued without notice, a hearing thereon shall be set for the earliest reasonable time;

At the hearing on the issuance of the writ or its continuance, the plaintiff shall have the burden of establishing the facts justifying the issuance and continuance of the writ;

On notice to the plaintiff obtaining the issuance of the writ without notice, the adverse party may appear and move dissolution or modification of the writ, and in that event the court shall proceed to hear and determine the motion as expeditiously as possible;

Any notice required under this section shall be in a form and served in a manner as will expeditiously give the adverse party actual notice of the proceeding, all as directed by the court;

In the event that property has been seized by the sheriff pursuant to the issuance of a writ without notice, the property shall be retained by him subject to the order of the court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 673; R.S. 1887, § 3021; Laws 1890-91, ch. 96, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 4146; C.S. 1910, § 5006; C.S. 1920, § 6276; R.S. 1931, § 89-4002; C.S. 1945, § 3-7402; W.S. 1957, § 1-1001; Laws 1973, ch. 173, § 1; ch. 214, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-21-1103, 1-34-102, 1-34-103; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Creditor may not use replevin prejudgment attachment to secure
two remedies. —

Where the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), under a security agreement, attempted to exercise its right to possess and sell collateral and under a promissory note attempted to take a judgment on the debt, the FDIC was not allowed to achieve both remedies in a single action using a procedural device, replevin prejudgment attachment. Coones v. FDIC, 848 P.2d 783,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency, as to content, of notice of garnishment required to be served upon garnishee, 20 ALR5th 229.

§ 1-15-104.
Prejudgment writs; bond required; objection to plaintiff's sureties;
hearing on objections; liability of sureties.

No prejudgment writ of attachment, replevin or garnishment shall issue unless the plaintiff files with the clerk a surety bond in an amount fixed by the court for the payment of all costs and damages which may be incurred or suffered by any party as a result of the wrongful issuance of the writ, not exceeding the sum specified in the bond.

If the party for whose benefit a bond under subsection (a) of this section is given is not satisfied with the amount of the bond or the sufficiency of the sureties, he may, within five (5) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, after the receipt of a copy of the bond, serve upon the party giving the bond a notice that the party for whose benefit the bond is given objects to the amount of the bond or the sufficiency of the sureties. If the party for whose benefit the bond is given fails to object within the time allowed he is deemed to have waived all objection to the amount of bond and the sufficiency of the sureties.

Notice of objections to the amount of bond and the sufficiency of sureties as provided in subsection (b) of this section shall be filed in the form of a motion for hearing on objections to the bond. Upon demand of the objecting party, each surety shall appear at the hearing of the motion and be subject to examination as to the surety’s pecuniary responsibility or the validity of the execution of the bond. Upon hearing, the court shall approve or reject the bond as filed or require any amended, substitute or additional bond as the circumstances warrant. If the court rejects the bond or if the plaintiff fails within the time allowed to file any amended, substitute or additional bond required by the court, any property seized under the writ shall be returned to the defendant.

The bond required by this section shall, in addition to other requirements, provide that each surety is subject to the jurisdiction of the court and irrevocably appoints the clerk of the court as the agent of the surety upon whom any papers affecting the liability of the surety on the bond may be served, and that the liability of the surety may be enforced on motion and upon notice as the court may require without the necessity of an independent action.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 108, 111, 126; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 523, 556, 561, 677; R.S. 1887, §§ 2871, 2904, 2909, 3025, 3524, 3527, 3542; Laws 1890-91, ch. 91, §§ 3, 6; R.S. 1899, §§ 3990, 4023, 4028, 4150, 4436, 4438, 4453; C.S. 1910, §§ 4849, 4882, 4887, 5010, 5316, 5299, 5301; C.S. 1920, §§ 6119, 6152, 6157, 6280, 6571, 6573, 6588; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1602, 62-1803, 62-1805, 89-3303, 89-3336, 89-3341, 89-4006; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-4706, 3-5003, 3-5041, 3-5306, 14-1203, 14-1205, 14-1402; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-228, 1-261, 1-266, 1-572, 1-695, 1-697, 1-1005; Laws 1973, ch. 173, § 1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-15-103

, 1-15-310, 1-15-315, 1-21-302, 1-21-1104, 1-21-1106, 1-34-107; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-105.
Writs; release of property or discharge of writ; undertaking required;
objections to defendant's sureties; liability of sureties.

At any time, either before or after the execution of a writ of attachment, replevin or garnishment, the defendant may obtain a release of any property or a discharge of the writ as follows:

To secure a discharge of the attachment or garnishment the defendant shall furnish a bond, with sufficient sureties, in a sum of not less than double the amount claimed by the plaintiff, but not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) in amount. The conditions of the bond shall be to the effect that if the plaintiff recovers judgment, the defendant will pay the judgment together with interest and all costs assessed against him, not exceeding the sum specified in the bond;

To secure a release of property seized under a writ of attachment, replevin or garnishment, the defendant shall furnish a bond, with sufficient sureties, in a sum not less than the value of the property to be released, but in no case in an amount greater than necessary to obtain a discharge of the writ under paragraph (i) of this subsection. The conditions of the bond shall be to the effect that if the plaintiff recovers judgment, the defendant will pay the judgment, together with interest and all costs assessed against him, not exceeding the sum specified in the bond.

The bond required by subsection (a) of this section shall be delivered to the sheriff at or before the time of service of the writ of attachment, replevin or garnishment. If the release or discharge is sought after the writ has been executed or the property seized, the defendant shall apply to the court, upon reasonable notice to the plaintiff, for an order releasing the property or discharging the writ.

The bond required by subsection (a) of this section shall be filed with the court, and a copy of the bond served upon the plaintiff. Within five (5) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, after the plaintiff is served with notice of the filing of the bond required by subsection (a) of this section the plaintiff may object to the amount of the bond or the sufficiency of defendant’s sureties, by serving upon the defendant and filing with the court a motion for hearing on objection to bond.

Upon demand of the plaintiff, each surety shall appear at the hearing requested under subsection (c) of this section, and be subject to examination as to the surety’s pecuniary responsibility or the validity of the execution of the bond. Upon hearing, the court shall approve or reject the bond as filed or require any amended, substitute or additional bond as the circumstances warrant.

Upon a discharge of the writ or release of the property under this section, all of the property released, if not sold, and the proceeds of any sale of the property, shall be delivered to the defendant. The release or discharge by the court shall not be effective until the time for plaintiff to object to the amount of the bond or the sufficiency of the defendant’s sureties has expired.

The bond required by this section shall, in addition to other requirements, provide that each surety is subject to the jurisdiction of the court and irrevocably appoints the clerk of the court as his agent upon whom any papers affecting the liability of the surety on the bond may be served, and that his liability may be enforced on motion and upon notice as the court may require without the necessity of an independent action.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 111, 127, 140, 141; Laws 1884, ch. 52, § 1; 1886, ch. 60, §§ 529, 545, 550, 677, 678, 681; R.S. 1887, §§ 2877, 2893, 2898, 3025, 3026, 3029, 3527, 3543, 3556, 3557; Laws 1890-91, ch. 91, § 6; 1897, ch. 43, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 3996, 4012, 4017, 4150, 4151, 4154, 4438, 4454, 4467, 4468; C.S. 1910, §§ 4855, 4871, 4876, 5010, 5011, 5014, 5301, 5317, 5330, 5331; C.S. 1920, §§ 6125, 6141, 6146, 6280, 6281, 6284, 6573, 6589, 6602, 6603; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1603, 62-1616, 62-1617, 62-1805, 89-3309, 89-3325, 89-3330, 89-4006, 89-4007, 89-4010; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5009, 3-5025, 3-5030, 3-7406, 3-7407, 3-7410, 14-1205, 14-1403, 141-1416, 14-1417; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-234, 1-250, 1-255, 1-573, 1-592, 1-593, 1-697, 1-1005, 1-1006, 1-1009; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-109,

1-15-207

,

1-15-304

, 1-21-303, 1-21-322, 1-21-323, 1-21-1106,

1-31-107

, 1-34-108, 1-34-111; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-106.
Discharge of improperly issued writs.

The defendant may at
any time, upon notice to the plaintiff as the court may require, move
the court in which the action is pending, to have a writ of attachment,
replevin or garnishment discharged on the ground that it was improperly
or irregularly issued. The court shall give the plaintiff reasonable
opportunity to correct any defect in the complaint, affidavit, bond,
writ or other proceeding so as to show that a legal cause for the
writ existed at the time it was issued.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 141 to 143; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 562, 563; R.S. 1887, §§ 2910, 2911, 3357 to 3359; R.S. 1899, §§ 4029, 4030, 4468 to 4470; C.S. 1910, §§ 4888, 4889, 5331 to 5333; C.S. 1920, §§ 6158, 6159, 6603 to 6605; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1617 to 16-1619, 89-3341, 89-3343; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-5042, 3-5043, 14-1417 to 14-1419; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-267, 1-268, 1-593 to 1-595; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-316, 1-21-323 to 1-21-325; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-107.
Notice
of exemptions; right to a hearing; procedures.

Within five (5) days after the court receives the person’s written request for a hearing, a person whose property is attached or whose property is in the possession of another person and is attached or garnished, and against whom no judgment has been entered, is entitled to a hearing on the attaching party’s right to the property. The sheriff shall mail to the person a copy of the order of attachment or writ of garnishment and notice of the right to a hearing under this section, at the time the order of attachment is executed or the writ of garnishment is served on the garnishee. The papers shall be sent by first class United States mail with the postage prepaid and the envelopes furnished and properly addressed by the plaintiff.

The notice required by this section shall inform the person of his right to request a hearing. The notice shall inform him that certain benefits and property cannot be taken to pay a debt and shall list the exempted benefits and property set forth in paragraphs (i) through (x) of this subsection. The notice shall also include a form for requesting a hearing and instructions that if the person believes he is entitled to retain or recover the property because it is exempt, or for any other reason, he should sign the form requesting a hearing and return or mail the form to the office of the clerk of court within ten (10) days after the date the notice was mailed to him. The request for hearing form shall set forth the following exemptions and provide a place for the person to designate which exemptions he claims:

Social security benefits pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 407 and supplemental security income;

Veteran’s benefits;

Black lung benefits;

Personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) payments;

Federal civil service and state retirement system benefits as provided in 5 U.S.C. 8346 and W.S.

9-3-426

,

9-3-620

,

9-3-712

and

15-5-313

;

Worker’s compensation benefits;

Unemployment compensation benefits;

Earnings from personal services as defined by W.S. 1-15-102(a)(vi);

Homestead, personal articles and articles used for carrying on a trade or business to the extent provided by W.S.

1-20-101

through

1-20-111

;

Other exemptions as provided by law.

The notice shall state that there may be additional exemptions not listed which may be applicable. Failure by the person to claim an exemption on the request for hearing form does not preclude him from claiming other exemptions or defenses at a hearing on the matter. If a person fails to make a written request for a hearing and claim exemptions pursuant to this section within ten (10) days after the date the notice was mailed to him, the notice shall state he may waive or lose his rights under this section.

The sheriff may withhold execution of the prejudgment writ of attachment or garnishment until the plaintiff either provides the person’s last known address or a statement that the plaintiff has no knowledge of the person’s last known address. The sheriff shall have no duty under this section if the plaintiff provides a statement that the plaintiff has no knowledge of the defendant’s address.

In the case of a post judgment writ of garnishment, procedures for notice and hearing on a claim of exemptions shall be as provided by W.S.

1-15-501

through

1-15-511

or

1-17-102

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 125; R.S. 1887, § 3541; R.S. 1899, § 4452; Laws 1905, ch. 38, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 5315; C.S. 1920, § 6587; R.S. 1931, § 62-1601; C.S. 1945, § 14-1401; W.S. 1957, § 1-571; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-15-119,

1-21-301

; Laws 1985, ch. 194, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 62, § 1; 1987, ch. 198, § 3; 1997, ch. 196, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 301.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b)(v), substituted “9-3-620,

9-3-712

and

15-5-313

” for “and

9-3-620

,” and made a related change; and in (b)(ix), substituted “through

1-20-111

” for “through

1-20-109

.”

Applied

in

Lingle State Bank v. Podolak, 740 P.2d 392,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 480

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Coones v. FDIC, 848 P.2d 783,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

§ 1-15-108.
Forms.

Affidavits, notices,
writs and other forms for use in attachment, replevin, garnishment
and continuing garnishment shall be in accordance with rules promulgated
by the supreme court of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.